Georgia statutes. TITLE 32 Highways, Bridges, and Ferries
PART 2 Railroads

32-6-190.
Duty to maintain grade crossings.

Any railroad whose track or tracks cross a public road at grade shall have a duty to maintain such grade crossings in such condition as to permit the safe and reasonable passage of public traffic. Such duty of maintenance shall include that portion of the public road lying between the track or tracks and for two feet beyond the ends of the crossties on each side and extending four feet beyond the traveled way or flush with the edge of a paved shoulder, whichever is greater, of such crossing.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-1006, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1050, § 1.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Criteria for elimination of highway-rail grade crossings, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, State Department of Transportation, Chapter 672-16.

Law reviews.

For note on the 2002 amendment of this Code section, see 19 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 213 (2002).

For comment, “Commercial Transportation,” see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 1087 (2018).

32-6-191.
Responsibility for construction of new grade crossings and relocation of existing grade crossings.

Where a new grade crossing results from the construction of a new or relocated railroad line, the railroad shall be responsible for and bear all expenses of the construction of such grade crossing. The department, when such a grade crossing is on the state highway system, a county, when such a grade crossing is on its county road system, or a municipality, when such a grade crossing is on its municipal street system, may impose such terms and conditions on the nature and manner of construction of such a grade crossing, including the installation of protective devices, as may be necessary for the safe and reasonable passage of public traffic.

Where a new grade crossing results from the construction of a new or relocated public road, the department, when such road is on the state highway system, a county, when such road is on its county road system, or a municipality, when such road is on its municipal street system, shall be responsible for and bear all expenses of the construction of such grade crossing. The railroad may impose such terms and conditions on the nature and manner of construction of such a grade crossing, including the installation of protective devices, as may be reasonably necessary for the safety and convenience of the traveling public. While on the right of way of any railroad during the construction of any such grade crossing, employees or contractors of the department or any county or municipality shall be subject to such rules and regulations of the railroad as may be reasonably necessary for the protection of its traffic, passengers, property, and its safe operation.

Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this Code section, the department, in respect to a grade crossing on the state highway system, a county, in respect to a grade crossing on its county road system, or a municipality, in respect to a grade crossing on its municipal street system, may close and relocate an existing grade crossing by relocation of a part of the public road involved, whenever such closing and relocation is reasonably necessary in the interest of public safety; and the procedure for such closing and relocation and the division of the costs of construction shall be the same as provided in Code Sections 32-6-194 and 32-6-195 for elimination of a grade crossing by construction of an underpass or overpass.

Where there is disagreement as to the terms and conditions imposed on the nature and manner of construction by the department, county, or municipality pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section or by the railroad pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section, the department shall make such determination after reasonable opportunity for a hearing is given to all parties concerned.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-1007, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 32; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1050, § 3.

Law reviews.

For note on the 2002 amendment of this Code section, see 19 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 213 (2002).

32-6-192.
Construction of underpass or overpass in lieu of grade crossing.

When the department, the county, or the municipality having jurisdiction of a public road determines that it is reasonably necessary and in the public interest to use an underpass or overpass instead of a grade crossing at a new or relocated railroad track or tracks or at a new or relocated public road, the procedure to be followed, the division of costs, and the maintenance responsibilities shall be the same as are provided in Code Sections 32-6-194 through 32-6-198.

History.

Ga. L. 1927, p. 299, § 3; Code 1933, § 95-1903; Code 1933, § 95A-1015, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-6-193.
Authority of department, counties, and municipalities to eliminate grade crossings.

When it is reasonably necessary in the interest of public safety, the department, in respect to the state highway system, a county, in respect to its county road system, or a municipality, in respect to its municipal street system, may authorize and direct the elimination of a grade crossing by construction of an underpass or overpass or by physical removal of the grade crossing and barricading or removing the approaches thereto without construction of an underpass or overpass, provided that any grade crossing elimination shall be in accordance with this part and that no grade crossing on a county road system or municipal street system shall be eliminated by construction of an underpass or overpass upon order of the county or municipality until and unless the department shall approve the plans and specifications of the proposed construction. No grade crossing on a public road shall be permanently closed except by elimination in accordance with this part.

History.

Ga. L. 1927, p. 299, § 1; Code 1933, § 95-1902; Code 1933, § 95A-1008, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1050, § 2.

Law reviews.

For note on the 2002 amendment of this Code section, see 19 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 213 (2002).

32-6-193.1.
Elimination of grade crossings by physical removal; procedures.

The department shall by rule or regulation prescribe uniform criteria for its own use and that of local governing authorities in assessing whether elimination of a grade crossing on a public road by physical removal of the grade crossing and barricading or removing the approaches thereto without construction of an underpass or overpass is reasonably necessary in the interest of public safety. For purposes of this Code section, “reasonably necessary in the interest of public safety” means that the enhancement of public safety resulting from such elimination of the grade crossing will outweigh any inconvenience to the reasonable passage of public traffic, specifically including without limitation emergency vehicle traffic, caused by such rerouting of traffic. Such criteria shall include consideration of each of the following factors:

Number and timetable speeds of passenger trains operated through the crossing;

Number and timetable speeds of freight trains operated through the crossing;

Distance to alternate crossings;

Accident history of the crossing for the immediately preceding five-year period;

Type of warning device present at the crossing, if any;

The alignments, horizontal and vertical, of the roadway and the railroad and the angle of the intersection of those alignments;

The average daily traffic volume in proportion to the population of the municipality if the crossing is located within a municipality or the population of the county if the crossing is located within an unincorporated area of a county;

The posted speed limit over the crossing;

The effect of closing the crossing upon access by persons utilizing:

Hospital or medical facilities and public health departments, specifically including without limitation utilization by medical personnel;

Facilities of federal, state, or local government, specifically including without limitation court, postal, library, sanitation, and park facilities; and

Commercial, industrial, and other areas of public commerce;

Any use of the crossing by:

Trucks carrying hazardous material;

Vehicles carrying passengers for hire;

School buses;

Emergency vehicles; or

Public or private utility vehicles, specifically including without limitation water, sewer, natural gas, and electric utility maintenance and repair vehicles; and

Any other relevant factors as prescribed by the department.

Any railroad may file a written petition requesting an order to eliminate a grade crossing on a public road by physical removal of the grade crossing and barricading or removing the approaches thereto without construction of an underpass or overpass. Any such petition shall be filed by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery, return receipt requested, with the department in respect to the state highway system, a county governing authority in respect to its county road system, or a municipal governing authority in respect to its municipal street system.

Any petition by a railroad under this subsection shall include without limitation information as to each of the factors set forth in paragraphs (1) through (5) of subsection (a) of this Code section.

The department or the local governing authority, whichever is applicable, shall conduct a public hearing on the matter prior to deciding whether to grant or deny such a petition.

No railroad shall have a duty to file a petition for elimination of a grade crossing as authorized by this subsection.

Neither the failure of a railroad to file such a petition nor any decision by the department or any local governing authority regarding such a petition shall give rise to a cause of action against the railroad, the department, or a local governing authority by a person for injuries or damages arising from the existence or use of such crossing.

If the department in respect to the state highway system, a county governing authority in respect to its county road system, or a municipal governing authority in respect to its municipal street system determines that elimination of a grade crossing in accordance with this Code section is reasonably necessary in the interest of public safety, the department or the local governing authority may issue an order to eliminate the crossing. Such order shall be in writing, and a copy shall be served upon the railroad. If a local governing authority issues such an order, it shall make a record of its findings and transmit a copy of the same along with the order to the department.

If the department in respect to the state highway system, a county governing authority in respect to its county road system, or a municipal governing authority in respect to its municipal street system determines that elimination of a grade crossing in accordance with this Code section is not reasonably necessary in the interest of public safety, the department or the local governing authority may issue an order denying a petition to eliminate the crossing. Such order shall be in writing, and a copy shall be served upon the railroad. If a local governing authority denies a petition, it shall make a written record of its findings and transmit a copy of the same along with the order and petition to the department.

Any railroad aggrieved by an order of a local governing authority under this subsection may make a written request to the department for review of such order. Such request shall be accompanied by a $500.00 filing fee. The department shall within 60 days after the filing of such request review the matter.

Upon review of the order and findings of the local governing authority and any filings by the railroad, if the department determines that elimination of a grade crossing in accordance with this Code section is not reasonably necessary in the interest of public safety, the department shall order that the crossing shall remain open.

Upon review of the order and findings of the local governing authority and any filings by the railroad, if the department determines that elimination of a grade crossing in accordance with this Code section is reasonably necessary in the interest of public safety, the department shall issue an order to eliminate the crossing.

Any such order of the department shall be in writing, and a copy of the order shall be served upon the railroad and the local governing authority. As part of such order, the department shall assess all its costs of investigating and reviewing the matter against the railroad if an order for the crossing to remain open is issued or against the county or municipality if an order to eliminate the crossing is issued, and the party so assessed shall be liable therefor to the department; provided, however, that any filing fee paid to the department by a railroad shall be applied to any such amount assessed against the railroad, and the balance of such filing fee, if any, shall be refunded to the railroad. The department shall keep detailed records of its costs of investigation and review for purposes of this subparagraph, and such records shall be subject to public inspection as provided by Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50.

If an order to close a grade crossing is issued, the railroad shall at its expense physically remove the crossing from the tracks and for two feet beyond the ends of the crossties on each side and extending four feet beyond the traveled way or flush with the edge of a paved shoulder, whichever is greater, of such crossing and erect a department approved barricade; and the department in respect to the state highway system, the county in respect to its county road system, or the municipality in respect to its municipal street system may at its expense remove approaches to the crossing. The provisions of Code Section 32-6-195 for division of costs of elimination of a grade crossing by construction of an underpass or overpass shall not apply to elimination of any grade crossing under this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

32-6-193.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 1050, § 4; Ga. L. 2004, p. 376, § 1.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Criteria for elimination of highway-rail grade crossings, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, State Department of Transportation, Chapter 672-16.

Law reviews.

For note on the 2002 enactment of this Code section, see 19 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 213 (2002).

32-6-194.
Procedure for grade crossing elimination.

Whenever the department, a county, or a municipality shall decide to eliminate any grade crossing on its respective public road system by means of an underpass or overpass, prompt notice of such decision shall be given to the railroad or railroads involved; and within 30 days thereafter the representatives of the department, the county, or the municipality and of the railroads involved shall meet and, within 90 days, agree to a plan and specifications for the construction of a grade separation structure. Any such agreement between a county or municipality and a railroad shall be submitted to the department for its approval; and work leading to the elimination of the grade crossing pursuant to the agreement shall not commence until and unless the department approves the same. The department, county, or municipality, by agreement with the railroad or railroads involved, may apportion the work to be done in the construction of such grade separation structure between the railroad or railroads and the department or the county or the municipality.

If agreement is not reached within 90 days, the department, county, or municipality may proceed with construction of a grade separation structure or may by written order direct the railroad or railroads involved to proceed with the construction of a grade separation structure according to the plan and specifications accompanying such order, provided that no work shall be begun on any grade separation structure on a county or municipal public road system until and unless the department approves the plan and specifications of such structure. It shall be the duty of said railroad to begin work on any such grade separation structure within four months after receipt of an order to that effect and to complete that structure within a reasonable time, provided that the railroad shall not be required to do the actual physical work of providing approaches by fill to an overpass or the excavating beneath an underpass or the approaches thereto, although the cost of such work shall be considered as part of the costs of the grade crossing elimination, whether actually performed by the railroad, the department, the county, or the municipality; and such costs shall be apportioned as provided in Code Section 32-6-195. If the railroad does not begin work within four months after receipt of an order to that effect, the department, county, or municipality may proceed with the construction of the proposed grade separation structure. If the railroad begins work within four months after receipt of an order to that effect but thereafter fails to complete such work within a reasonable time, the department, county, or municipality may proceed to complete the unfinished work.

In any case where the construction of all or part of a grade separation structure is done by the department, a county, or a municipality, a statement of any railroad’s share of the costs of the project, as determined pursuant to Code Section 32-6-195, plus 8 percent per annum interest on each expenditure of the cost of such project shall be submitted to the railroad upon completion of the project. In the event that the railroad does not make payment or arrange to make payment to the department, county, or municipality within 60 days of receipt of the statement, the department shall certify the amount for collection to the Attorney General; or, in the case of a project on a county or municipal public road system, the county or municipality shall take appropriate action for the collection of the amount thereof. In the event said share is not paid within the time specified in this Code section, said share or any unpaid portion thereof shall bear interest at a rate of 8 percent per annum from the date due.

The department, a county, or a municipality shall not construct or require any railroad to construct an underpass of a plan, specification, or design, the strength of which, in the judgment of the railroad, shall not be sufficient to meet the requirements of its traffic thereover. In a plan providing for an overpass or underpass, the department, a county, or a municipality shall not interfere with or change the grade or alignment of the track or tracks of any railroad or relocate the line of the railroad without its consent.

History.

Ga. L. 1927, p. 299, §§ 3, 4, 10; Code 1933, §§ 95-1903, 95-1906, 95-1910; Code 1933, § 95A-1009, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 32.

32-6-195.
Division of costs of grade crossing elimination projects.

The costs of the grade crossing elimination project in which the railroad or railroads shall be required to share shall include the costs of surveys, preparation of plans and specifications, the securing of estimates or bids, if any, and the total cost of construction of the grade separation structures involved, including the establishment of drainage and any excavation and other expenses involved in constructing public roadways or railroad lines under any grade separation structure. However, the railroad or railroads shall not be required to participate in the cost of any construction outside the limits of grade or alignment change required for the public road to go over or under the track or tracks of the railroad or railroads nor in any costs apportionable to purposes other than the elimination of the grade crossing. Where additional lanes are added to the public road, the railroad’s share of the cost, if any, shall be based on the cost of a grade elimination project having the same number of lanes as the public road prior to the construction of said grade elimination project.

The costs of the project shall be shared by the parties involved in such manner as may be agreed upon by the railroad or railroads involved and the department, county, or municipality. Such agreement shall have precedence over any existing agreement on the same subject matter and shall give consideration to the following factors: the benefits accruing to the railroad or railroads and to the public, respectively, from the elimination of the grade crossing; the circumstances under which the grade crossing was created; any preexisting rights of the railroad or railroads as result of being first in position; comparison of the degree of danger caused by the railroad or railroads and by quantity and character of traffic upon the public road; and what is generally, under comparable circumstances, considered to be reasonable, provided that in no event shall the railroad be required to pay more than 50 percent of the cost of a grade crossing elimination project on a county road system or on a municipal street system. In the event agreement cannot be reached, the determination of what portion of the costs shall be the fair and reasonable share of the railroads involved shall be made by the department after reasonable opportunity for hearing to all parties concerned. In making such determination, the department shall give due regard to the considerations heretofore enumerated. The agreed value or, in the absence of agreement, the independently appraised value of the fee or any lesser interest in the right of way of the railroad used for such project shall be determined and such value credited to the railroad as a part of its participation in the cost of the project, provided that nothing in this Code section shall prevent the department, county, or municipality from exercising its rights of eminent domain as now or hereafter provided by law.

As used in this subsection, the term “costs of the project” means:

In the case of a project for part of a county road or municipal street system, the total costs of such project less the sum of any funds for such project furnished by the federal and state governments; and

In the case of a project for part of the state highway system, the total costs of such project less any funds furnished by the federal government.

History.

Ga. L. 1927, p. 299, § 6; Code 1933, § 95-1905; Code 1933, § 95A-1010, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 32.

32-6-196.
Temporary use of railroad rights of way during construction or maintenance of grade separation structures or grade crossing or protective devices.

All railroads shall permit the temporary use, free of cost, of so much of their rights of way as may be necessary during the construction or maintenance of any grade separation structures or any grade crossing or protective devices, provided that, whenever any employees or contractors of the department or of any county or municipality shall enter the right of way of any railroad, they shall be subject to any reasonable rules and regulations such railroad may make for the protection of its traffic, employees, passengers, and operations.

History.

Ga. L. 1927, p. 299, §§ 4, 13; Code 1933, §§ 95-1906, 95-1913; Code 1933, § 95A-1010, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-6-197.
Responsibility for maintenance of overpasses and underpasses.

It shall be the duty of the department to maintain all overpasses involving railroads on the state highway system.

It shall be the duty of the county or the municipality to maintain at its own expense the drainage, surface, pavement, approaches, and guardrails of all overpasses involving railroads on its respective public road system. It shall be the duty of the railroad involved to maintain at its own expense any floors constructed of wood and the foundations, piers, abutments, and superstructures of all overpasses on the county or municipal public road system.

It shall be the duty of the railroad or railroads involved to maintain all underpasses except the lighting, drainage, and pavement of the public roads thereunder, which shall be maintained by the department, counties, or municipalities on their respective public road systems.

All maintenance required by this Code section of the department shall be at the expense of the department, and all maintenance required by this Code section of the railroad shall be at the expense of such railroad, provided that the duty of maintenance imposed upon the department by this Code section shall not operate to subject the department to liability for damages resulting from any failure to maintain properly.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of Code Section 32-6-195, nothing in this article shall be construed as voiding agreements executed prior to July 1, 1973.

History.

Ga. L. 1927, p. 299, § 9; Code 1933, § 95-1909; Ga. L. 1950, p. 419, § 1; Code 1933, § 95A-1011, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 32.

32-6-198.
Agreements as to grade crossing elimination.

Nothing in this part shall be construed to prevent the department, a county, or a municipality from reaching special agreements with a railroad company providing for grade crossing elimination by means of relocation of either the railroad or public road involved or by other means not expressly provided for in this part and from arranging joint participation in the cost of such elimination in accordance with the procedures in Code Section 32-6-195.

History.

Ga. L. 1927, p. 299, § 12; Code 1933, § 95-1912; Code 1933, § 95A-1012, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-6-199.
Improvement of existing underpass or overpass.

Whenever an existing underpass or overpass involving railroads is unsafe or inadequate to serve reasonably the traffic for which it was constructed, the department, the county, or the municipality may proceed to bring about improvement of said existing structure. In such event the procedure, division of the costs of construction, and maintenance responsibilities in regard to such improvement shall be as provided in Code Sections 32-6-194 through 32-6-198.

History.

Ga. L. 1927, p. 299, § 8; Code 1933, § 95-1908; Code 1933, § 95A-1013, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

Cross references.

Restriction on authority of Public Service Commission to require railroad to reconstruct underpass, trestle, or grade crossing to accommodate motor vehicle exceeding 12 feet, six inches in height, §

46-8-133

.

32-6-200.
Installation of protective devices at grade crossings; school bus routes that cross rail crossings.

Whenever, in the judgment of the department in respect to the state highway system, a county in respect to its county road system, or a municipality in respect to its municipal street system, such protection is reasonably necessary for the safety of the traveling public, the department or the county or the municipality may order the protection of a grade crossing by the installation of protective devices. Prompt notice of such order shall be given to the railroad or railroads involved; and within 30 days thereafter the representatives of the department, the county, or the municipality and of the railroad or railroads involved shall meet and, within 90 days, agree to a plan and specifications for the acquisition and installation of protective devices. If an agreement is not reached within 90 days, the department, the county, or the municipality may order the railroad company or companies involved to proceed with the acquisition and installation of protective devices, as indicated in the plan and specifications accompanying its order. However, no work leading to the installation of protective devices at a grade crossing on a county or municipal public road system shall commence until and unless the plan and specifications for such device are approved by the department. It shall be the duty of the railroad or railroads to proceed with acquisition and installation of protective devices within 60 days after receipt of an order to that effect and to complete such acquisition and installation within six months thereafter.

The expense of acquiring and installing a protective device shall be shared between:

The department and the railroad involved, in such portions as may be determined by the negotiation procedures set forth in subsection (b) of Code Section 32-6-195, including consideration of all pertinent factors included in said subsection to be weighed in determining a reasonable division of costs and including the right of the department after a hearing to make the determination of the fair and reasonable costs to be shared by the railroad in the event that agreement as to such division of costs cannot be reached; and

The county or municipality and the railroad involved, equally.

However, if such device shall be required as a result of a new road being constructed over an existing railroad, 100 percent of such cost shall be the responsibility of the department, county, or municipality involved; and, if such device shall be required as the result of a new railroad, 100 percent of such cost shall be the responsibility of the railroad.

As used in this subsection, the term “expense of acquiring and installing a protective device” means:

In the case of a protective device for part of a county road or municipal street system, the total cost of such project less the sum of any funds for such project furnished by the federal and state governments; and

In the case of a protective device for part of the state highway system, the total cost of such project less any funds furnished by the federal government.

The railroad or railroads shall maintain all protective devices at its or their own expense; and nothing in this subsection shall be construed to impose any public liability on the department or any county or municipality in any manner regarding such devices. However, nothing in this subsection shall prevent an agreement between the railroad or railroads and an industry or industries, which agreement assesses the cost of construction or maintenance of such devices against the industry or industries to be served by such track.

In any case where the protective devices are acquired and installed by agreement or by order of the department, a county, or a municipality, a statement of such public agency’s share of the costs of the project, as determined by such agreement or pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section, shall be submitted by the railroad involved to the public agency involved upon completion of the project and upon nonpayment may be collected as provided by law.

As used in this subsection, the term “active warning devices” means automated control gates, lights, and warning bells, used singly or in any combination.

Each local school district in this state shall survey its established school bus routes annually and submit to the Department of Transportation a list identifying each rail crossing that does not have active warning devices on an established bus route. Each local school district shall be required to submit this information to the department each year by no later than September 1.

Each local school district shall exercise best efforts to minimize the number of established school bus routes that cross rail crossings that do not have active warning devices.

The department shall use the information about school bus routes as an important factor in selecting rail crossings to upgrade with active warning devices.

History.

Ga. L. 1927, p. 299, §§ 3, 7; Code 1933, §§ 95-1903, 95-1907; Code 1933, § 95-1907.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1967, p. 458, § 1; Code 1933, § 95A-1014, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 497, § 2/HB 426.

Cross references.

Further provisions regarding installation of protective devices at grade crossings, §

46-8-194

et seq.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 497, § 1/HB 426, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The General Assembly is interested in increasing safety at railroad crossings, especially crossings used by school buses, and therefore finds that certain legislation may enhance such safety.”

Law reviews.

For comment, “Commercial Transportation,” see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 1087 (2018).

32-6-201.
Regulation of traffic when necessary to perform maintenance.

Whenever it is necessary for the department, a county, or a municipality to perform any maintenance in regard to a grade separation structure, protective devices, or grade crossing, responsibility for which is imposed on such department, county, or municipality by this part, and the regulation and control of railroad traffic is necessary for the performance of such maintenance, it shall be the duty of the railroad or railroads involved, after receiving notice, to assist the department, county, or municipality by providing reasonable regulation and control of railroad traffic, having due regard to the needs of such traffic and to the public welfare.

Whenever it is necessary for a railroad to perform any maintenance in regard to a grade separation structure, protective devices, or grade crossing, responsibility for which is imposed on such railroad by this part, and the regulation and control of pedestrian and vehicular traffic is necessary for the performance of such maintenance, it shall be the duty of the department, the county, or the municipality, after having received notice, to assist the railroad by providing reasonable regulation and control of pedestrian and vehicular traffic, having due regard to the needs of such traffic and to the public welfare.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-1016, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.